Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1244.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Pelvic Floor Therapy.--(a) A government program offered or a health insurance policy issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this subsection shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of pelvic floor dysfunction and linked or related conditions, including:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) Pelvic floor therapy. (2) Biofeedback. (3) Trigger point therapy. (4) Electrical stimulation. (5) Postoperative care for prostatectomies.(6) Postoperative care for hysterectomies.(7) Postpartum pelvic floor assessments.(b) Coverage under this section shall remain subject to an insurer's or government program's medical necessity policies, any copayment, coinsurance or deductible amounts stated in the policy.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Government program" means any of the following:(1) The Commonwealth's medical assistance program established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."(2) The children's health insurance program under Article XXIII-A."Health insurance policy" means as follows:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(2) The term does not include accident only, fixed indemnity, limited benefit, credit, dental, vision, specified disease, Medicare supplement, Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services supplement, long-term care or disability income, workers' compensation or automobile medical payment insurance.20250HB1244PN1393 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Insurer" means an entity licensed by the Insurance Department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Pelvic floor dysfunction" means the inability to control the muscles of the pelvic floor."Pelvic floor therapy" means the treatment applied to pelvic floor muscles to treat problems associated with the pelvic floor, including incontinence, difficulty with urination or bowel movements, constipation, chronic pelvic pain, painful intercourse, diastasis recti, pelvic organ prolapse and linked or related conditions.Section 2. The addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.20250HB1244PN1393 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1244PN1393 - 4 - 1